Utah statutes.
17-27a-502.   Preparation and adoption of land use ordinance or zoning map.

(1)  The planning commission shall:

(a)  provide notice as required by Subsection 17-27a-205(1)(a) and, if applicable, Subsection 17-27a-205(4);

(b)  hold a public hearing on a proposed land use ordinance or zoning map;

(c)  if applicable, consider each written objection filed in accordance with Subsection 17-27a-205(4) prior to the public hearing; and

(d) (i)  prepare and recommend to the legislative body a proposed land use ordinance or ordinances and zoning map that represent the planning commission's recommendation for regulating the use and development of land within all or any part of the unincorporated area of the county; and

(ii)  forward to the legislative body all objections filed in accordance with Subsection 17-27a-205(4).

(2)  The county legislative body shall consider each proposed land use ordinance and zoning map recommended to it by the planning commission, and, after providing notice as required by Subsection 17-27a-205(1)(b) and holding a public meeting, the legislative body may adopt or reject the proposed ordinance or map either as proposed by the planning commission or after making any revision the county legislative body considers appropriate.



Amended by Chapter 324, 2013 General Session

